Massachusetts, session 194th, H951.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 26A of chapter 21 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “effluent”, in line 67, the
following words:- , hydraulic fracturing fluid.
SECTION 2. Section 27 of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding
the following clause:-
(14) Enforce restrictions on drilling, waste treatment and disposal and mining activities
which have been enacted to protect the water quality and the natural resources of the
commonwealth.
SECTION 3. Section 42 of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “commonwealth”, in line 3, the following words:- ,or into an injection
well or into a treatment works in the commonwealth.
of 2

SECTION 4. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Fluid”, any material or substance which flows or moves whether in semi-solid, liquid,
sludge, gas or any other form or state.
“Gas”, all natural gas, whether hydrocarbon or nonhydrocarbon, including hydrogen
sulfide, helium, carbon dioxide, nitrogen, hydrogen, casinghead gas and all other fluid
hydrocarbons not defined as oil.
“Hydraulic fracturing”, the process of pumping a fluid into or under the surface of the
ground in order to create fractures in rock to produce or recover oil or gas.
“Oil”, crude petroleum, oil and all hydrocarbons, regardless of specific gravity, that are in
the liquid phase in the reservoir and are produced at the wellhead in liquid form.
“Oil and gas”, oil and gas collectively, or either oil or gas, as the context may require to
give effect to the purposes of this chapter.
“Enhanced geothermal systems,” the process of injecting fluid into naturally existing or
artificially created fractures in rock to enable the production of geothermal energy.
(b) a person shall not engage in hydraulic fracturing in the Commonwealth, except when
performed as part of an enhanced geothermal system for the purpose of energy production.
(c) a person shall not collect, store, treat or dispose of wastewater hydraulic fracturing
fluid, wastewater solids, drill cuttings or other byproducts from hydraulic fracturing in the
Commonwealth, except as generated from enhanced geothermal systems.
of 2